lexc/noun/enhuoamely.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§J§ §JP§
§VV§   §ooez23§ §EOA22§ §OEOE21§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §AE22§ §OEOE22§ §oeoez21§ §oooe2§ 
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §oeoez24§ §k§ §t§ 
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Gen;
                            Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA2§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounvekny
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possvekny;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurvekny;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1vekny;

LEXICON Possvekny
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Famvekny;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Famvekny;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Famvekny;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famvekny;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Famvekny;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Famvekny;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Famvekny;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Famvekny;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Famvekny;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Famvekny;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Famvekny;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Famvekny;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1vekny;

LEXICON Plurvekny
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genvekny;
                            Gen1vekny;
        
LEXICON Famvekny
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genvekny;
                       Genvekny;
LEXICON Fam1vekny
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genvekny;
                       Gen1vekny;

LEXICON Genvekny
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casevekny;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casevekny;
                       Casevekny;
 
LEXICON Gen1vekny
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casevekny;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casevekny;
                       Case1vekny;
 
LEXICON Casevekny
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case1vekny
!+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
!+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
!+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
!+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
!+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
!+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
!+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
!+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
!+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
!+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
!+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounvekny1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Casevekny1;

LEXICON Noun
adatdíj AddNoun;
akkutermékdíj AddNoun;
alapdíj AddNoun;
alaptiszteletdíj AddNoun;
almadíj AddNoun;
alátéthéj AddNoun;
angyalhéj AddNoun;
anyagdíj AddNoun;
aranyváltságdíj AddNoun;
atomhéj AddNoun;
avokádóhéj AddNoun;
balettdíj AddNoun;
belhéj AddNoun;
betegnyugdíj AddNoun;
blazírt AddNoun;
boksznyugdíj AddNoun;
borotvaszíj AddNoun;
burgonyahéj AddNoun;
bányadíj AddNoun;
békedíj AddNoun;
bérletdíj AddNoun;
böngészőhéj AddNoun;
bőrszíj AddNoun;
charterdíj AddNoun;
csapadékdíj AddNoun;
csatolószíj AddNoun;
cseppkőhéj AddNoun;
csereszíj AddNoun;
csigahéj AddNoun;
csomagpótdíj AddNoun;
csoportdíj AddNoun;
cséplőgépszíj AddNoun;
csúcsdíj AddNoun;
darabdíj AddNoun;
deszkahéj AddNoun;
dióhéj AddNoun;
donordíj AddNoun;
díj AddNoun;
elektronhéj AddNoun;
előtéthéj AddNoun;
energiadíj AddNoun;
erénydíj AddNoun;
ezüstdíj AddNoun;
faktordíj AddNoun;
faíj AddNoun;
fehérrépahéj AddNoun;
fellépődíj AddNoun;
fenőszíj AddNoun;
filmjogdíj AddNoun;
fogasszíj AddNoun;
forgatókönyvdíj AddNoun;
fuvardíj AddNoun;
félgömbhéj AddNoun;
fókabőrszíj AddNoun;
függesztőszíj AddNoun;
fődíj AddNoun;
fűzőlik AddNoun;
garázsdíj AddNoun;
gitárdíj AddNoun;
gumihéj AddNoun;
gyepdíj AddNoun;
gyermektartásdíj AddNoun;
gyógydíj AddNoun;
gáztartályhéj AddNoun;
géppisztolyszíj AddNoun;
gömbhéj AddNoun;
hagymahéj AddNoun;
hajtásszíj AddNoun;
halasztódíj AddNoun;
hanglemeznagydíj AddNoun;
harangszíj AddNoun;
hektárdíj AddNoun;
hevederszíj AddNoun;
homlokszíj AddNoun;
hulladékdíj AddNoun;
hámigaszíj AddNoun;
héj AddNoun;
hívásdíj AddNoun;
hűségdíj AddNoun;
imaszíj AddNoun;
inkasszódíj AddNoun;
iskoladíj AddNoun;
jegyzetdíj AddNoun;
jutalékdíj AddNoun;
játékdíj AddNoun;
kakaóhéj AddNoun;
kamudíj AddNoun;
kapacitásdíj AddNoun;
kardszíj AddNoun;
karóraszíj AddNoun;
kazettajogdíj AddNoun;
kenyérhéj AddNoun;
kikötődíj AddNoun;
kishíj AddNoun;
klubtagdíj AddNoun;
kolbászhéj AddNoun;
kollégiumdíj AddNoun;
koncessziódíj AddNoun;
korbácsszíj AddNoun;
koronadíj AddNoun;
kristályhéj AddNoun;
kukadíj AddNoun;
kupolahéj AddNoun;
kábeldíj AddNoun;
kéglidíj AddNoun;
kéreghéj AddNoun;
kínahéj AddNoun;
kórusdíj AddNoun;
könyvtárösztöndíj AddNoun;
körzetdíj AddNoun;
kötőszíj AddNoun;
közmunkadíj AddNoun;
középnyugdíj AddNoun;
küldöncdíj AddNoun;
lakkbőrszíj AddNoun;
lefűzőszíj AddNoun;
lemezdíj AddNoun;
letétdíj AddNoun;
licenciadíj AddNoun;
lisztdíj AddNoun;
luxusóraszíj AddNoun;
lízingdíj AddNoun;
magánnyugdíj AddNoun;
mandulahéj AddNoun;
markolathéj AddNoun;
meglepetésdíj AddNoun;
mellékszereplődíj AddNoun;
menedzsmentdíj AddNoun;
mestervizsgadíj AddNoun;
minimumtagdíj AddNoun;
modemdíj AddNoun;
moteldíj AddNoun;
munkaóradíj AddNoun;
másodpercdíj AddNoun;
mérlegdíj AddNoun;
műdíj AddNoun;
nagydíj AddNoun;
narancshéj AddNoun;
nyakszíj AddNoun;
nyersanyagdíj AddNoun;
nyugdíj AddNoun;
nívódíj AddNoun;
orrszíj AddNoun;
padlizsánhéj AddNoun;
panaszdíj AddNoun;
parahéj AddNoun;
parkolódíj AddNoun;
pedálszíj AddNoun;
plédszíj AddNoun;
polcdíj AddNoun;
porhéj AddNoun;
programdíj AddNoun;
próbateremdíj AddNoun;
páholydíj AddNoun;
pályaszakaszdíj AddNoun;
példányszámdíj AddNoun;
pótlékdíj AddNoun;
rabszolgadíj AddNoun;
rakodódíj AddNoun;
rebarbarahéj AddNoun;
reflexíj AddNoun;
retekhéj AddNoun;
riportdíj AddNoun;
rokkantnyugdíj AddNoun;
rákhéj AddNoun;
részmunkadíj AddNoun;
révhajófuvardíj AddNoun;
rögzítőszíj AddNoun;
sakkösztöndíj AddNoun;
segédorrszíj AddNoun;
sokadik AddNoun;
sportvándordíj AddNoun;
strucctojáshéj AddNoun;
szabadságdíj AddNoun;
szakemberdíj AddNoun;
szalonnahéj AddNoun;
szaunadíj AddNoun;
szemledíj AddNoun;
szemétdíj AddNoun;
szerszámdíj AddNoun;
szobadíj AddNoun;
szorgalomdíj AddNoun;
szponzordíj AddNoun;
szupernóvahéj AddNoun;
szállításdíj AddNoun;
számszeríj AddNoun;
színészdíj AddNoun;
szólistadíj AddNoun;
sárgabarackhéj AddNoun;
sérelemdíj AddNoun;
sósborszeszdíj AddNoun;
tagdíj AddNoun;
tandíj AddNoun;
tanulódíj AddNoun;
tarkószíj AddNoun;
tartóhéj AddNoun;
teherdíj AddNoun;
teknőshéj AddNoun;
tenderdíj AddNoun;
termináldíj AddNoun;
terméknagydíj AddNoun;
testvérdíj AddNoun;
titoktartásdíj AddNoun;
tomboladíj AddNoun;
tranzitdíj AddNoun;
táncdíj AddNoun;
táskaszíj AddNoun;
távmunkadíj AddNoun;
tévéjogdíj AddNoun;
többletviteldíj AddNoun;
túlsúlydíj AddNoun;
valenciahéj AddNoun;
versenydíj AddNoun;
villamosszíj AddNoun;
vizitdíj AddNoun;
váltságdíj AddNoun;
vázlatdíj AddNoun;
vékny AddNounvekny;
vékny:vékony AddNounvekny1;
vízműdíj AddNoun;
zsűridíj AddNoun;
államdíj AddNoun;
árnyékdíj AddNoun;
átlagösztöndíj AddNoun;
élőmunkadíj AddNoun;
óradíj AddNoun;
övszíj AddNoun;
ütőszíj AddNoun;
